src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-taettad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tättad: # Verb 'to wish' - full paradigm
     tättad+V+Inf: tättad
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: täättam
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: täättak
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tätt
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tättap
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tättveʹted
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tätta
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: täättat
     tättad+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: täätt
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tattum
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tattuk
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: täättai
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [täättaim, täättain, täättaiim]
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: täättaid
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tattu
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: tattuš
     tättad+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: tättam
     tättad+V+Pot+Sg1: täättžem
     tättad+V+Pot+Sg2: täättžiǩ
     tättad+V+Pot+Sg3: täättaž
     tättad+V+Pot+Pl1: [täättžep, täättžim, täättžin]
     tättad+V+Pot+Pl2: täättžid 
     tättad+V+Pot+Pl3: täättže
     tättad+V+Pot+Sg4: täättžet
     tättad+V+Pot+ConNeg: täättže
     tättad+V+Cond+Sg1: täättčem
     tättad+V+Cond+Sg2: [täättčiǩ, täättčeǩ]
     tättad+V+Cond+Sg3: täättči
     tättad+V+Cond+Pl1: [täättčim, täättčin, täättčep]
     tättad+V+Cond+Pl2: täättčid
     tättad+V+Cond+Pl3: täättče
     tättad+V+Cond+Sg4: täättčeš
     tättad+V+Cond+ConNeg: täättče
     tättad+V+Imprt+Sg2: täätt
     tättad+V+Imprt+Sg3: täättas
     tättad+V+Imprt+Pl1: tättap
     tättad+V+Imprt+Pl2: tättad
     tättad+V+Imprt+Pl3: tättaz
     tättad+V+Imprt+ConNeg: täätt
     tättad+V+Imprt+ConNegII: tattu
     tättad+V+Actio+Ess: tättmen
     tättad+V+Actio: tättam
     tättad+V+Act+PrsPrc: tättai
     tättad+V+Act+PrfPrc: tättam
     tättad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: tattum
     tättad+V+VAbess: [täättkani, täättǩeânai, täättǩani, täättǩâni, täättkâni, täättǩânai, täättǩeânnai, täättǩenai, täättkâna]
     tättad+V+Ger+Ess: täätteeʹn
     tättad+V+Ger+Instr: täätteeʹl
